training/data/hyph_fil.tex
\patterns{
.a1a
.aba3l
.a2bn
.abug3
.a4buga
.aga2
.agad3
.a1h
.ak3l
.ak3la
.a3lo
.a3lon
.alu2
.a3lug
.alun3
.ampa3
.ana2
.anak3
.a4naka4
.a3nga
.a3no.
.a3nu.
.a1p
.ara2
.araw3
.a4rawa
.a1s
.a2st
.a2t3r
.at3ra
.ba3la
.ba3le
.bat2
.bu3li
.bu3o.
.ca2
.ca2k
.dabu3
.da3lu
.de1
.dina3
.e1b
.e1d
.e1k
.e1l
.es1
.fe2
.fe2b
.g2
.ga1
.ga4big
.ga2r
.g2l
.g2lo
.go2b
.he1
.hihi3
.hi2w
.ho1
.hu1
.hu2k
.i1a
.iabu3
.ia3la
.ia3li
.i1g
.i1h
.i1i
.ii2s
.i1k
.im1
.imp2
.i3ng
.i3nga
.in2s
.int2
.i1p
.i1r
.i1t
.ita3
.ita3n
.i1u1
.iyu2
.je1
.k2
.ka1
.kada3
.ka4nik
.kapa4k
.kas2
.kina3
.ki4tak
.ki4tan
.kot2
.ku2b
.ku3lu
.k2w
.k2wa
.la2k
.la3la3
.la3yo
.la3yu
.let2
.li4bol
.loo2
.lu2b
.lu3g
.lu3ga
.mada3
.ma3dy
.mapa3
.ma3re
.mu2n
.nabu3
.nar2
.ne1
.ni1
.no1
.nu1
.o1
.o1a1
.o1b
.o2bh
.o2rg
.pa3ku
.pana3
.pe2b
.peli3
.pu3li
.pupu3
.ri1
.ru1
.s2
.sa4bis
.sa3la
.sa3le
.sa2m
.san3t
.sa3y
.sa3yo
.si2l
.si3t
.si3to
.s2p
.s2pi
.suba3
.susu3
.ta3k
.ta3ko
.ta3ku
.ta2m
.ta3no
.ta3yu
.tutu3
.u1a
.u2bl
.ug1
.u1k
.u3li.
.ulit3
.u3lo
.u3lo.
.u1m
.u1t
.u1u1
.wa3l
.wa3la
.wa3lo
.wa2t
.yuta3
a1a
a1a.
a1a1a
a1a1b
aaba3l
aa2bn
a1a1d
a1a1g
a1a1h
a1ak
aa2k.
aa2kb
aa2kt
aa2ky
a1a1l
aa2l.
a1a2m
aa2ma
a1an
aan2g
aa3no
aa3no.
aa3nu
aa3num
aa2ny
a1a1p
a1a1r
aara3
aara3l
a1as
a1at
a1a1w
a1b
a2b.
a1ba
abaa2
aba3la
abas2
aba3yo
a2b1d
a2bda2
a2bes
a4bigab
a2bik
a4bisab
a2bla
1a2b1n
a2bno
a4bugab
abu3l
abu3lo
abu3o
abu3o.
a1da
a2d3a2g
ad3aga
ada3li
ada3lu
1a1de1
ad1h
a1di
a1do
a1du1
ad1w
ad1y
a3dyen
a1e
a1e.
a1en
a1e1r
a1ga
3aga2d3
3agad.
agad3a
aga3nd
ag1b
ag1g
ag1h
a1gi
a2gib
ag2ig
ag2it
ag1k
agka3
agka3n
ag1l
ag1m
ag1n
agnga3
a1go
ag1p
ag1s
ag1t
agta3
agta3n
a1gu1
agu2m
ag1w
agwa2
ag1y
a1h
a1ha
a1he
a1hi
ahi2w
ahiwa3
a1ho
a1hu1
ahulu3
a1i
a1i.
a1ib
a1i1i
a1i1l
aila3
aila3n
a1im1
a1in
a1i2s
ai2sa
a2k.
a1ka
akaa2
aka3li
ak3a4na
aka4nak
aka3nt
akata3
a2k1b
a2kba
a3kbo.
a1ke
ak1h
a1ki
a4kipak
aki2t
a3klas
ak3lat
1ak1m
a1kr
ak1s
a2k1t
a2ktu
a3kuty
ak1w
a2k1y
a2kya
a2l.
a3lado
a3lahi
a4laka
a4lakal
ala3l
ala3la
a3lang
a3lani
a3lapi
a3las
a3las.
a3lasu
a3lat
a3lat.
a3latu
a3lay.
a3laya
a3lays
al1b
alba2
1al1d
a3lete
a3libo
alig2
a4limal
a4lingm
a3lis.
a3list
al1m
a4longk
a3lubh
a3lub3i
a3lug
a3lug.
a3lun.
a4lungk
al1w
a2maa2
ama3l
ama3la
ama3li
amasa4
amasa4m
amata3
am1b
am1d
amda2
amdam3
a1me
a2mik
amin2
am1p
ampa3
ampa3l
a1mu1
a2n.
a1na
ana2k3
3a4nak3a4
a4naka4n
ana2y3
anay3a
an1b
anbu2
a1ne
an2g
a2ng.
an2ga
a3ngah
a3ngal
a3ngar
ang3g
ang3gu
ang3un
an1h
a1ni
a4nika
a4nikan
a2n1l
a2nlu
an1m
a3non
a3nong
an1s
ansi2
a2nt2
3antin
a2n3to
an3to.
an3ton
ant2s
a2ntu
anu1
a3num
a3numa
a2n1y
a2nya
a2nyo
a1og
a3ong
a3ong.
a1os
a2p.
a1pa
apa2g
apa4kip
apa3li
ap1d
a1pi
a1po
a1pr
ap3u2s
ap3usa
a1py
a1ra
ara3la
a4rawar
a2r1b
a2rbe
a2rbi
a2rbo
ar1d
a3re.
ar1h
ar1k
ar1m
a1ro1
a2rs
ar2s.
a2rsa
ar1t
a1ru1
arunu3
ar1y
a2s.
a1sa
asa2k
asaka3
a4sa4yan
as1d
a1se
a1si
asi2l
a2sk
a2s2ka
as1l
asla2
as1m
a1so
a2st
a2str
a1su1
a1s2y
as2ya
a2t.
a1ta
ata3kb
ata3o
ata3on
a1te
at1h
a1ti
at1l
at1n
a1to
a1t2s
at2so
a1tu1
atuba3
a1ul
aulit3
a1u2m
au2ma
a1ur
a1u1t
a1u1u1
a2w.
a1wa
awa3l
awa3lo
a2w3a2r
aw3ara
a1wi
a1ya
a4yangm
ay1b
ayba2
aybaha4
aybu2
ay1g
aygu2
ay1h
ayhi2
ay1l
ay1n
ayna2
ay1p
aypa2
ay1r
a2y1s
a2ysa
a3yu2t
a3yuta
ay1w
1b
2b.
1ba
1ba.
1ba1a
1ba1b
ba2b.
1bad
1ba1e
1bag
1bah
ba1i2
2bai2b
1bak
1bal
ba3la
ba3lad
ba3lah
ba3lan
ba3las
ba3lat
ba3le
ba3let
ba3lis
ba3lo
ba3lo.
1ban
banal3
ba2ng
ba3nga
4bangi
4bangib
ba3no
ba3no.
1ba1o
1ba1p
1bar
1bas
1bat2
bat2s
1baw
ba3yo
ba3yo.
2bays
2b1d
2b1da2
2bda2b
1be
be1b
1be1h
be1k
1bel
1ben
1ber1
ber2o
besa2
1bey
2b1h
2b1ha
2bhan
2bhas
2b1he1
2bhet
1bi1a
bi1b
1bid
1big
biga2
4bigab
4bigabi
2bi1k
2bika2
bilis3
1bin
bins2
bi1r
4bisab
4bisabe
4bisabi
2b3isi
b3isip
bit1
2bitk
1bi1y
2b1la1
2blad
1ble
bli1
2blig
2b1n
2b1no
2bnor
1bo.
1bo1b
1bod
bog1
2boga2
1bok1
boli2
4bolib
4bolibo
4bolibu
1bon
bo1o
1bos
1bot
1boy
2bra
2bral
bre1
2brer
bru1
bu1b
buga2
4bug3ab
4bugabo
bu3gan
1buh
bu1i1
1buk
2bu3li
bu3lit
bu3loy
bu1m
1bun
bu3nga3
bung3g
1buo
1bu1r
1bu1t
1buu
1buw
bu1y
bwi1
2b1y
2b1ye
2byer
ca2
ca2k
ca2ke
car1
1da
1da.
da1a
1dab
da2b.
da2bd
dabu3
dabu3g
1dad
2da2g
2d3a2ga
d3agad
1da1h
1dak
1dal
da3lis
da3lo
da3lo.
da3lu2
da3lub3
1dam
dam3in
da3nga
4dangh
4dangha
2danh
1da1o
1dar
1das1
1da1t
da1y
1de
1de.
de1d
1dek2
dek2s
1de1l
de1m
1den1
1de1r
d1h
d1ha1
d1hi1
1di
1di.
1di1d
dig1
1di1h
1dik
1di1m
dina3
dina3l
4dingh
4dinghi
1di1p
1dis
1di1t
1di1w
1di1y
1do
1do.
do1d
1dol
1don
do1o
1do1p
1dor1
1do1s
2do1t
2doto2
d1re
1dri
d1s
d1su
1du
1du.
du1d
du1g
1du1h
1duk
du1l
1du1m
1dur
d1w
d1wa
d1we
d2yan
3d2yen
3dyent
dyu1
e1b
e1ba
eba3no
e1be
e1bi1
e1bo1
e2b1r
e2bra
e2bre
e1da
e1de
e1di1
e1du
e1ga
e1ge
e1go1
eg1r
e1gu
e1h
e1ha
e1he
e1hi1
e1ka1
e1ke
e1ki
e1kl
ek1n
e1ko1
eks2
ek2s.
eks2w
ek1t
e1ku1
e1kw
e1la
e1le
e1li
eli3k
eli3ku
el1p
el1y
e1ma1
em1b
e1me
e1mo
e1na1
en1d
e1ne
en1h
e1ni1
en1s
en2st
ens2y
en1t
enta2
e1o1
e1o1g
e1o1l
e1pe
e1pl
e1po1
ep1t
e1ra
er1b
e1re
er1h
e1ri2
eri2a
er1k
er1m
er1n
e1r2o
er2o.
er2ok
er2ol
er1s
er1t
erte2
er1y
e1sa2
esa2b
e1se
e1si1
es1k
e1so
es1p
es1t
e1su
e1ta
e1te
e1ti1
et1n
e1to
et1p
et2se
e1w
e1we
e1ye
ey1n
fe2
fe2b1
fe2br
2g.
1ga1a
gaa3no
gaa3nu
ga4big
ga4biga
g3a2bo
g3abog
ga2bu
2ga2d3a2
gad3ag
1ga1g
gaga3n
ga1h
ga1l
ga2l.
1gam
ga3nd
ga3nda
ga2ng
ga3nga
g3anti
ga2ny
1ga1p
ga2p.
3gar.
ga2rs
1gas
1gat
1gaw
g1b
g1ba
g1be
g1bi
g1bo1
g1bu
g1di1
g1do
g1du
1ge
1ge.
ge1g
g1ga
ggo1
ggu1
g3gulo
g1gw
g1h
g1ha
ghan2
g1he
g1hi
ghin2
2g1ib
gi2ba
2gibi
1g2i1g
g2igi
gilug3
1gi1r
gi1s
g2it
g2ita
1giw
g1i2y
gi2yo
g1k
g1ka
gkama3
gka3n
gka3no
g1ki
gki2t
g1ko
g1ku
g1l
g1la
g1li
g2lo1
g2lob
g1m
g1ma
gma2s
gmasa4
gmasa4y
g1mi1
g1n
g1na1
g1ng
gnga3
gnga3n
g1ni1
go2b1
go2by
go1g
1gon
1got
g1p
g1pa
gpapa3
g1pi
g1pu
gpu2l
gpupu3
1gra1
g1re1
gru1
g1s
g1sa
g1si
g1so
g1su1
g2tad
gta2m
gta3n
gta3no
gto1
gtu1
1gu1a
1gu1g
1gu1h
gu1l
1gum
gu2mp
g3u2na
g3una.
1gu1r
1gus
1gut
g1wa2
gwa2g
1gwi
g1y
g1ya
g1yo
1h
1ha
1ha.
ha1b
1ha1d
1hag
1ha1h
1hak
1hal
1ham
1han
1hap
1ha1r
1has
1hat
ha1w
2hayb
1he
1he.
1hed
he1h
1hel
1he1n
he1o1
1he1t
1hi
1hi.
1hi1a
1hi1h
hihi3
hihi3n
1hi1i
1hi1k
1hil
1him
1hin
hi3n3t
hi3n3to
1his1
1hit
1hi2w
hi2wa3
hiwa3l
1hi1y
1ho
1ho.
1hod
ho1h
1hol
1hon
1hu1
1hu.
1hu1b
hu1h
hu2k1
hu2kb
1hu1l
hulu3
hulu3g
hu1m
huma2
human3
1hu1n
hu1w
i1a
i2a.
i1a1a1
iaan2
i1a1b
iabu3
iabu3l
i1ad1
i1ag
i1a1h
i1ak
i1al
ia3la
ia3lay
ia3li
ia3lis
i1an
i1ar
i1as
i2b.
i2bai2
iba2l
iba2n
i4bangi
i1be
i1bi
i4bolib
ibu1
i2bul
i1da
i1de
i1di
i1do
i1du1
id1y
2ig
i2g.
i1ga
iga2b
ig1b
2i1gi
2igin
ig1k
ig1m
ig1n
i1g2t
ig2ta
i1gu1
ig1y
i1h
i1ha
i1he1
i1hi
ihi3n3t
i1hu1
i1i
i1i1b
i1in1
1i1is
i1it
i1i1w
i1i1y
i1ka
ika2b
ika2m
ika2n
ikawa3
ik1h
i1ki
i1ko
i1kr
ik2s.
ik2ta
iku1
i3kula
i1la
i2las
ila2w
i1li
ili2s3
ilis3a
i1lo
1ilu
ilug3
i3lug.
ilug3a
i2l1y
i2lyo
i1ma
im1b
i1me2
ime2t3
imet3r
i1mi
i1mo
im1p2
imp2y
i1mu1
i1na
ina3k
ina3kl
inala3
ina3li
ina3lu
inama3
in1b
in1d
ing3an
i3ngay
i1ni
ino1
insa2
in2sk
ins2y
int2
int2s
inu1
i3nusu
i2nut
in1y
i1pa
ipa2k
i1pi1
i1pl
i1re1
i1ri1
i1ro
i1ru
isa2b
i2sai2
is3an.
is1b
isbi2
i1se1
i1si
3isip
3isipa
is1k
is1m
is1p
is1t
i1su1
i1s2y
is2ya
i2t.
2ita
i4taki
i4takit
2itan
i4tangk
ita3no
it1h
i1ti
itiwa3
it1k
itka2
it1n
i3tol
i3tolo
it1p
itpu2
i1tr
it1s
it3ul
it3uli
i1u
i1ul
i1u1s
i1u1u1
i2wah
iwa3l
iwa3la
iwa3li
i1wi
i1y
i1ya
iya3no
i1ye
i1yi
i1yo
i4yungi
je1
je1s
2k.
1ka
1ka.
1ka1a1
kaaba3
1kab
kaba3y
1kad
kada3
kada3l
1kag
1ka1h
1ka1i
kaila3
1ka1k
kaka3n
1kal
ka4laka
ka3li
ka3li.
1kam
kama3l
1kan
2kana2
k3a4nak3
ka4naka
ka4nik
ka4nika
ka2nl
ka3no
ka3no.
ka2nt
ka3nta
ka2ny
1kap
kapa4k
kapa4ki
ka2rb
ka2s2k
2kasl
kas2y
1kat
kata3o
ka1u1
1kaw
kawa3l
ka2ys
2k1b
2k1ba
2kbay
2k1bo
2kbo.
1ke
ke1k
ken1
1ker
keri2
1ket
k1h
k1ha
1ki
1ki.
1ki1b
1kid
1ki1k
1ki1l
1kin
2kina3
kina3k
kipa2
4kipak
4kipaki
1kis
1kit
ki4tak
ki4taki
ki4tan
ki4tang
1ki1u1
3klas
3klasi
k3lat
k3lat.
1kle1
k1li1
k1m
k1ma
k1n
k1ni1
1ko.
1kod
ko1k
2koli2
kolu2
ko2mp
1kon
1ko1o
1kop2
kop2y
1kor
1ko1s
kot2s
k1p
k1pu
1kr
1kra1
1kri
1kro
k1s2
k2s.
k1sa
k1si
k1su1
k1s2w
ks2wa
k1sy
1k2ta
k2tad
k1te
k1ti1
k1tr
2k1tu1
2ktuh
1kub
ku2by
1ku1h
1ku1k
3kula
3kula.
ku3las
kuli2
ku3lu
ku3lug
1kum
1kun
ku2nd
kunda3
1kur1
kut1
3kuty
3kutya
1ku1y
k2wad
k2war
kwa2t
k1wi
2k1ya
2kyat
1kyu1
2l.
1la.
1la1a
1la1b
lada2
3lado
3lado.
1lag
la1h
3lahan
3lahi
3lahin
1lak
laka2
4lakal
4lakala
lakas3
1lal
la3la
la3la3y
1lam
lama2
la3nga
3langi
3lani
3lani.
lant2
la1p
lapa2
3lapi
3lapi.
1lar
3las.
2lasi
3lasim
3lasu
3lasub
3lat.
3latu
3latuh
1la1w
la2w.
3lay.
3laya
3laya.
3lays
3laysa
l1b
l1ba2
lba2n
l1d
l1da1
1le1b
1le1g
le1l
1le1p
1le1r
1les
let2
3lete
3lete.
let2s
liba2
3liban
3libo
3libol
3lidad
1li1g2
li2g.
2lig2t
1li1h
1li1i
1lik
2lik2t
1li1l
1lim
4limal
4limali
1lin
4lingm
4lingma
1li1p
3lis.
2lisa
lis3an
3lisay
2lisb
3list
3listi
3lis2y
3lisya
3litas
lit3ul
li1u
1li1w
l1k
l1ku
l1m
l1mo
l1mu1
2lo1b
2lobo
2lobu
1lod
1log
lo1h
1lok
lo1l
lo1m
4longk
4longka
lo1o2
loo2b
lo1p
1lor1
1lot
low1
loy1
l1p
l1po
l1pu
2l1t
l1ta1
l1ti1
2l1to
2lto.
l1tu1
luba2
3lu2bh
3lubha
3lu2b3i
3lub3is
3lug.
lu3gar
3lugo
3lugo.
lu1h
3luhan
1luk
1lu1l
1lum
3lun.
lun3al
lung3
lung3a
4lungk
4lungka
lu1p
1lu1r
lu1s
lu1t
1lu1w
luy1
l1w
l1wa1
2ly
l1ya
2lyo
2lyon
lyu1
1ma
ma1a
2maa2m
1ma1b
1mad
mada3
mada3l
ma3d2y
ma3dye
1mag
magka3
magta3
ma1h
ma1i1
1ma1k
1mal
ma3lan
ma3las
ma4lima
ma4ling
1mam
1man
ma2n.
ma2n3t
man3to
ma1p
mapa3
mapa3n
ma3re
ma3re.
1mas
masa4m
masa4ma
mas2y
1ma1t
ma2t.
mata3
mata3o
2ma1u
2mau2m
1maw
1may
m1b
m1ba
m1bi1
m1br
m1bu
m1d
m1da2
mda2m3
mdam3i
1me
1me.
1med
me1k
me1m
1men1
mer1
1met
1mi
1mi1b
1mig
1mi1h
1mi1i1
mik2
mika2
mik2s
1mil
1mi1m
1min
mi2nu
1mit
1mi1y
m1n
m1na
1mo
1mo.
1mo1k
1mo1l
mo1m
1mon
1mor
mo1t
2mp2
2m1pa
mpa3l
mpa3la
2mpay
m1pe
m1pi
m1pl
2m1p2y
mp2ye
2mpyu
m1r
m1ra
1mu1
1mu.
1mu1g
1mu1h
1mu1k
mu2lt
1mu1m
1mun
mu2nd
1mu1p
1mu1s
musu3
musu3n
1mu1t
1mu1u1
1mu1y
2n.
1na
1na.
1na1a
1na1b
nabu3
nabu3o
1na1d
1nag
1na1h
na1i
4nak3a4n
4nakan.
4naka4na
na3kl
na3kla
nala3l
na3lap
2nalb
na3li
na3lid
na3lis
n3alon
na3lu
na3luh
1nam
nama3l
1nan
nana2
nana3l
nanay3
na3nga
4nang3u
4nangun
na3no
na3no.
1nap
1nar
nar2s
1nas
1nat
na1u1
1naw
2nayh
2nayn
n1b
n1be
n1bu2
nbu2w
2n1d
2nda
nda3l
nda3lo
2ndan
n4dangh
n1de
ndek2
n4dingh
2n1do
2ndo.
n1du1
1ne.
ne1g
1nen
1ner
1nes
n2g
2ng.
n2ga
3ngah
3ngaha
3ngal
3ngal.
3ngala
3ngali
3ngalu
ngan2
3ngana
ng3ant
3ngar
3ngara
n2gat
3ngay
3ngay.
ng1b
ng1h
1ngi
2ngi2b
2ngi2y
2ng1k
2ngko
ng1l
ng1m
ngma2
ngmasa4
1ngo
ng1p
ngpu2
ng1s
ng1t
ngta2
ngu4lo.
ng3una
ng1y
n1h
n1ha
nhag2
n1hi
1ni
1ni.
1ni1b
1ni1d
1nig
1ni1h
ni1k
nika2
4nikan
4nikani
1ni1l
1nim
1nin
1nip
1nis
2nitp
ni1w
1ni1y
n1l
n1la
n1li1
2n1lu1
2nlur
n1m
n1mi
nmin2
n1n
n1ng
no1a
nod1
1no1g
1no1h
1no1l
1no1m
3nong.
1no1o
1nor1
no1s
n1p
n1pa1
n1s
nsa2p
n1se
n1si1
nsi2t
n2s1k
n2skr
n2s1t
n2sti
n1su1
n1s2y
ns2ya
2nt2
n1ta
nta2b
n1te
n1ti
nting3
n4tinga
2nto
3ntok
3ntok.
2n3ton
n3tong
n1tr
n1t2s
nt2sa
nt2si
2ntu1
2ntut
nu1a
1nu1b
nud1
1nu1k
1nu1l
nu1m
3numa2
3numan
numi2
1nun
nu3nga
4nungp
4nungpu
nu1o
nu1s
3nusu
3nusun
2nu1t
2nuto
n1w
n1wa1
2n1y
2n1ya
2nyan
2nyay
n1ye1
nyer2
2n1yo
2nyon
o1a
o1an
o1a1s
o1b
1o2b.
o1ba
oba3la
oba3lo
o1be
o2b1h
o2bhe
o1bi
o1bo
o1bu1
o2b1y
o2bye
odo1
o2dot
od1s
o1du
oduksi4
o1dy
o1e1
o1e1l
og1a2
oga2b
og1d
o1go
o1gr
o1h
o1ha
o1hi
o1ho
2ok
2o1ka
2oka.
o1ko
ok1p
o1kr
ok1s
ok1t
o1ky
2ol.
o1la
o1le1
o1li
oli2b
oli2k
ol1k
o1lo1
ol1p
ol1t
o1lu
olu2k
o1m
o1ma
omas2
o1me
o1mi
omik2
o1mo1
o2m1p
o2mpy
o1na
ona3l
ona3li
ong1
o1ni
on1n
o1no1
on1s
on1t
on1y
o1o
o1o.
o1o2b
oo2b.
o1o1l
o1on
o1or1
op2
o1pi1
o1pl
o1po
o1pu
o1p2y
op2ya
o1ra1
1or1d
o1re1
o2r1g
o2rga
o1ri1
or1k
or1m
or1n
o1ro
or1p
or1s
or1y
o1sa
o1si
os1k
o1so1
os1p
os1t
o1sy
o1ta
o1te
o1to2
oto2d
o1t2s
ot2se
ot1t
o1tu
o1wo
ow1s
owsi2
o1yo
oy1t
o1yu
2p.
1pa
1pa.
1pa1a1
paa2k
paara3
pa1b
1pad
1pag1
pa2ga
pa1h
1pak
pa4kip
pa4kipa
pa3ku
pa3kut
1pal
pa3lay
pa3li
pa3lib
1pam
1pan
pana3
pana3l
pa3nga3
pang3g
1pa1p
papa3
papa3l
1par
pa3re.
1pa1s
1pat
pa1u
1paw
1pay
p1d
p1di
1pe
1pe.
pe2b1
pe2br
1pek1
pe1l
peli3
peli3k
1per
1pet1
1pi
1pi.
1pi1k
1pil
pina3n
2pins
pi1p
1pis
1pit
1pi1y
1pl
1pla
1ple
1plo
plu1
1po.
1po1g
po1p
1por
